New York, session 2025-2026, A3390.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public housing law is amended by adding a new section 2 12-a to read as follows: 3 § 12-a. Senior housing task force. 1. There is hereby established 4 within the division of housing and community renewal a senior housing 5 task force which shall meet at least once annually in different 6 geographical areas of the state. All members shall be provided with 7 notice reasonably in advance of each meeting with date, time and 8 location of such meeting. Task force members may use videoconferencing 9 for attendance and participation. The task force shall consist of 10 sixteen members and shall include representatives from the following 11 state agencies: the division of housing and community renewal, the 12 office for the aging, the department of health, the office of mental 13 health, the department of economic development, the office for people 14 with developmental disabilities, the division of protective services for 15 adults of the office of children and family services, and the New York 16 city department for the aging. Of the eight remaining members, three 17 shall be appointed by the speaker of the assembly, three shall be 18 appointed by the temporary president of the senate, one shall be 19 appointed by the minority leader of the assembly and one shall be 20 appointed by the minority leader of the senate, and shall broadly repre- 21 sent housing and senior citizen groups from all geographic areas of the 22 state including service providers, associations, advocates, proprietors, 23 and consumers of for-profit and not-for-profit senior housing options 24 including but not limited to: assisted living facilities, adult homes, 25 skilled nursing facilities, independent living facilities, naturally EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06616-01-5 A. 3390 2 1 occurring retirement communities, neighborhood naturally occurring 2 retirement communities, and continuing care retirement communities. 3 Members shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be 4 reimbursed for travel and other expenses actually and necessarily 5 incurred in the performance of their duties. The task force shall be 6 co-chaired by the commissioner of the division of housing and community 7 renewal and the director of the office for the aging. The task force is 8 responsible for conducting an annual state-wide assessment of senior 9 housing needs taking into consideration the various geographical areas 10 and different needs of the seniors in those areas and resources avail- 11 able in those different areas and project those needs over the next five 12 years; other factors which shall be taken into consideration are: health 13 care needs of seniors, the long term care needs of seniors, financial 14 resources available to seniors, or needed by seniors, and transportation 15 needs of seniors. The assessment shall include, but not be limited to, a 16 review of innovative approaches successfully being implemented in New 17 York state and in other states and their potential for implementation or 18 expansion in this state. Such assessment shall also develop a plan for 19 providing quality senior housing to meet the projected needs of seniors 20 located in different geographical areas of the state. 21 2. The task force shall issue a report by each January first outlining 22 its findings, recommendations, and the state plan. The report shall be 23 delivered to the governor, the speaker of the assembly, the temporary 24 president of the senate, the chairpersons of the housing, aging and 25 health committees in the assembly, and the chairpersons of the housing, 26 construction and community development, aging and health committees in 27 the senate. 28 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 29 have become a law.